GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-names.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     first names
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, G. Depau
!#
!# CREATED:	14-May-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!#
!# ============================================================================

Multichar_Symbols

+Prop +Adj +NAdj
+Demonym

+Firstname

+Sg +Pl
+Masc +Fem

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space

^]	! lemma boundary (for inflecting proper names)

!# continuation classes
LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;

LEXICON MFSG	MSG; FSG;

LEXICON ROOT
Ada+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Adalberta+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Adalgisa+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Adelaide+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Adele+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Agata+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Agnese+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Agostina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Aida+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alba+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alberta+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alda+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alessandra+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Alessia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alice+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alida+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Amalia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Amanda+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Ambra+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Amelia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Angela+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Angelica+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Angelina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Anita+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Anna+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Annabella+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Annunziata+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Antigone+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Antonella+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Antonietta+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Assunta+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Aurora+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Belinda+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Benvenuta+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Bice+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Bruna+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Camilla+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Carla+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Carmina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Cassandra+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Cecilia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Celestina+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Clara+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Clelia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Concetta+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Cordelia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Cristiana+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Dafne+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Dalila+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Danila+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Debora+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Denise+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Donata+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Doris+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Edda+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Efisia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Eleonora+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Elsa+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Emilia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Enrica+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Erika+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Ester+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Eva+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Fabiana+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Fatima+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Fiorenza+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Flaviana+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Floriana+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Francesca+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Gabriela+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Gaetana+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Gianna+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Gilda+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Gina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Ginevra+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Giuditta+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Giuliana+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Giuseppa+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Giusi+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Giusy+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Grazia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Graziella+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Immacolata+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Ines+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Isabella+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Isidora+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Itala+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Lara+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Lavinia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Lidia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Linda+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Loredana+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Lorenza+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Lucia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Lucrezia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Luisa+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Mafalda+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Mara+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Maria+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Mariastella+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Marilisa+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Marisa+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Marta+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Matilde+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Maurizia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Michela+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Mimì+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Mirella+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Monica+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Nilde+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Noemi+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Norma+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Orfelia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Ornella+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Paola+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Patrizia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Perpetua+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Piera+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Pompea+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Rachele+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Raffaella+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Rita+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Romana+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Rosa+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Sabina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Samanta+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Serena+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Silvana+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Simonetta+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Sonia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Stella+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Tiziana+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Ursula+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Vanessa+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Viola+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Virgilia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Vittoria+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Wanda+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Wilma+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Abdone+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Abilio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Accursio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Acuzio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Adalio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Adelardo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Adelisio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Adilio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Adorno+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Agato+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Agnello+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Aladino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Alceo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Aleardo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Algisio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Alipio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Alpinolo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Amalio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Aminta+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Angelico+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Annino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Anselmo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Aquila+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ardito+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ariele+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Arminio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Arsilio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Astro+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Aurelio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Aviero+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Babila+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Balderico+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Barbaro+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Barnaba+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Barula+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Baudolino+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Bello+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Benito+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Bernone+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Besa+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Bianchino+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Biondino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Boetiano+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Bonetto+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Bosone+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Brizio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Caio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Canzio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Carmenio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Cartesio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Catino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Cecilio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Cesco+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Cherubino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ciccillo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Cirillo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Clizio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Concettino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Corallino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Corrado+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Crispino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Curzio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Dalio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Davide+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Deliso+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Diego+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Divio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Dono+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Duilio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Edo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Egisto+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Elettro+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Eliodoro+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Elso+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Emanuele+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ennio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ercole+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ermenegildo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Esilio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Eudilio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Euro+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Evo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Faliero+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Fedele+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Filippo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Fiorindo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Floro+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Fulgenzio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Gavino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Gentile+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Giamaria+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Gianni+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Giombattista+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Glicerio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Guelfo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Illuminato+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Iridio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ivano+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Lavino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Letiziano+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Lino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Lorino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Luigi+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Magno+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Mancio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Marello+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Martiniano+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Maurizio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Melitone+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Metodio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Mirco+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Musonio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Nello+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Nino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Nunziato+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Olcese+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Omero+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Orfelio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Orsolino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ottato+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Palmero+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Paride+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Pierfranco+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Plinio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Quadrio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Randolfo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Roberto+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Rosello+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Salvo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Selvaggio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Simone+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Stellino+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Telemaco+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Tereso+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Trifone+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ulivio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Vando+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Veo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Vilfredo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Viviano+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Zeffiro+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
